Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1462
Landlord, defined.

Landlord shall mean the mobile home park owner and any agent authorized to act on the owner's behalf in matters relating to tenancy in the park and shall include the manager of a mobile home park who fails to disclose as required by sections 76-1479 to 76-1482.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 13.